Michigan, session 2025-2026, HB4704.
PEOPLE OF THE STATE OF MICHIGAN ENACT:
Sec. 109t. Beginning on the effective date of the amendatory
act that added this section, the department shall provide coverage
under the medical assistance program for group prenatal care
services. As used in this section:
(a) "Early childhood" means from birth until 12 months of age.
(b) "Group prenatal care services" means not more than 12
prenatal care visits provided in a group setting that are based on
an evidence-based model that includes health assessments, social
and clinical support, and educational activities in a family-
OOH H01288'25 (H-1) 91oa4r


centered environment and peer-to-peer interaction that helps
pregnant individuals support one another during their pregnancy and
into early childhood.
(c) "Group setting" means a group of not less than 3
individuals.
Final Page
OOH H01288'25 (H-1) 91oa4r